Indiana, session 2026, SB17.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 13-11-2-47.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 47.8. "CPI-U", for purposes of
IC 13-17-3-9.5, means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers, all items, as published monthly by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics.
SECTION 2. IC 13-17-3-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) The commissioner shall enter into a contract
described in subsection (b) with a local air pollution control agency
that is:
(1) established or designated by a town, city, or county under
IC 13-17-12-1(b); and
(2) willing to enter into the contract.
(b) A contract entered into under this section must do the
following:
(1) Require the department to:
2026 IN 17—LS 6101/DI 150


(A) advise, consult, and cooperate with; and
(B) provide technical assistance to;
the local air pollution control agency.
(2) Either authorize the local air pollution control agency:
(A) to undertake air pollution control activities, including:
(i) monitoring regional ambient air quality; and
(ii) within the local air pollution control agency's
jurisdiction, issuing operating permits and operating
permit revisions, performing compliance inspections,
responding to complaints and emergencies, and initiating
enforcement actions;
on behalf of the department; or
(B) to:
(i) issue operating permits and operating permit
revisions;
(ii) perform compliance inspections;
(iii) respond to complaints and emergencies; and
(iv) initiate enforcement actions;
as authorized by ordinances of the town, city, or county, as
applicable, that are consistent with or more restrictive
than air pollution control laws.
(3) Provide that the local air pollution control agency must be
paid fair monetary compensation for the activities described
in subdivision (2) from funds available to the department for
administration of the air pollution control laws, including the
following:
(A) United States Environmental Protection Agency
federal grant funding for the purpose of air pollution
control program support activities funded under Section
105 of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. 7405), as
further described in Section 66.001 of the Catalog of
Federal Domestic Assistance.
(B) United States Environmental Protection Agency
federal grant funding for the purpose of PM2.5 air
monitoring activities funded under Section 103 of the
federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. 7403), as further
described in Section 66.034 of the Catalog of Federal
Domestic Assistance.
(C) Revenue from annual operating fees established under
326 IAC 2.
(D) The environmental management special fund
established under IC 13-14-12.
2026 IN 17—LS 6101/DI 150


(E) Any other source of funds approved by the governor
and the budget agency.
(c) The monetary compensation provided to a local air pollution
control agency under a contract entered into under this section:
(1) must be at least sufficient to cover the staffing and
operating costs incurred by the local air pollution control
agency in performing activities described in subsection (b)(2);
and
(2) shall be adjusted each year according to the CPI-U.
(d) An adjustment under subsection (c)(2):
(1) must take place each year not later than thirty (30) days
after the release of the CPI-U for January of that year; and
(2) must adjust the rate of compensation to the local air
pollution control agency in proportion to the difference
between the CPI-U released for January of that year and the
CPI-U released for January of the previous year.
SECTION 3. IC 13-17-12-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Air pollution
control laws do not prevent towns, cities, or counties from:
(1) enforcing local air pollution ordinances consistent with air
pollution control laws; or
(2) adopting or enforcing more restrictive ordinances to further
the expressed purposes of air pollution control laws.
(b) To enforce local air pollution ordinances under subsection
(a), a town, city, or county must establish or designate an agency
to act for the town, city, or county as a local air pollution control
agency.
(c) A local air pollution control agency established or designated
by a town, city, or county under subsection (b) may:
(1) enforce the air pollution ordinances of the town, city, or
county;
(2) undertake air pollution control efforts on behalf of the
department under a contract entered into under
IC 13-17-3-9.5; and
(3) under section 3 of this chapter, administer the air pollution
control program of the town, city, or county in cooperation
with one (1) or more other towns, cities, or counties located
within the same air quality basin.
SECTION 4. IC 13-17-12-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. An A local air
pollution control agency of a town, city, or county that has entered
into a contract with the commissioner under IC 13-17-3-9.5 shall
2026 IN 17—LS 6101/DI 150


submit annual reports as requested by the department.
2026 IN 17—LS 6101/DI 150